Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201176-1507
Definitions, sections found.

For purposes of sections 76-1507 to 76-1516, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 76-1508 to 76-1514 shall
be used.

Laws 1981, LB 9, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB160, § 1.
August 27, 2011